Montana, session 2025, HB503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Fleeing from or eluding peace officer. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3),
a person convicted of or pleading guilty or no contest to an offense under 61-8-316 is guilty of a misdemeanor
and shall be imprisoned for a term not to exceed 1 year or fined an amount not to exceed $2,000, or both.
(2) A person convicted of the offense of aggravated fleeing from or eluding a peace officer under
61-8-316 is guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned for a term not to exceed 5 years or fined an amount not to
exceed $5,000, or both.
(3) A person convicted of an offense of fleeing from or eluding a peace officer during which the
person causes serious bodily injury to or the death of any other person is guilty of a felony and shall be
imprisoned for a term not to exceed 10 years or fined an amount not to exceed $10,000, or both.
Section 2. Section 61-8-316, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-8-316. Fleeing from or eluding peace officer. (1) A person operating a motor vehicle commits
the offense of fleeing from or eluding a peace officer if a uniformed peace officer operating a police vehicle in
the lawful performance of the peace officer's duty gives the person a visual or audible signal by hand, voice,
emergency light, or siren directing the person to stop the motor vehicle and the person knowingly fails to obey
the signal by refusing to bring the motor vehicle to a stop, increasing the speed of the motor vehicle, continuing
at a speed that is 10 or more miles an hour above the applicable speed limit, extinguishing the motor vehicle's
lights, or otherwise fleeing from, eluding, or attempting to flee from or elude the peace officer.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 503
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 503
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), a person convicted of or pleading guilty or nolo
contendere to an offense under subsection (1) shall be imprisoned for a term not to exceed 1 year or fined an
amount not to exceed $2,000, or both.
(b) A person convicted of an offense of fleeing from or eluding a peace officer during which the
person causes serious bodily injury to or the death of any other person shall be imprisoned for a term not to
exceed 10 years or fined an amount not to exceed $10,000, or both.
(2) A person commits the offense of aggravated fleeing from or eluding a peace officer if:
(a) the person has previously been convicted of fleeing from or eluding a peace officer under this
section; or
(b) in the course of fleeing from or eluding a peace officer, the person:
(i) exhibits reckless driving behavior as provided in 61-8-301, including intentionally steering the
motor vehicle toward any other person;
(ii) causes property damage to the property of any other person in an amount exceeding $5,000;
or
(iii) leaves the state.
(3) A person who is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to a violation of this section is
subject to the penalties provided in [section 1]."
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
61, chapter 8, part 7, and the provisions of Title 61, chapter 8, part 7, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 503
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 503, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 503
INTRODUCED BY D. BAUM, J. ISALY, S. KELLY, P. STRAND, J. SECKINGER, M. CUFFE, C. SPRUNGER,
G. LAMMERS, S. VINTON, J. WINDY BOY, G. OBLANDER, J. COHENOUR, D. HAWK, D. HAYMAN, S.
MORIGEAU, S. ESSMANN
AN ACT REVISING LAWS REGARDING FLEEING FROM OR ELUDING A PEACE OFFICER; CLASSIFYING
MISDEMEANOR AND FELONY CONVICTIONS; PROVIDING PENALTIES; REORGANIZING PROVISIONS TO
CONFORM TO THE PATTERN IN TITLE 61, CHAPTER 8; AND AMENDING SECTION 61-8-316, MCA.